Massachusetts, session 194th, S2050.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2(a)(2) of Chapter 62 is hereby amended by adding the following new subclause
(R):
(R) Any wages received from the United States government by a Massachusetts resident
who is a member of the United States military and serving on active duty based outside the
Commonwealth.
of 1